apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON 				ಪಡೆ__v!receive
%<v%>%<ger%>: # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>			:ದ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>				:ದನು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>			:ದ aaga ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>			:ದಿರುವ 	# ;!iruva?
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ದಿದೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ದಿದ್ದ	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>				:ದಿದ್ದಾರೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>				:ದಿದ್ದರು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ದಿತ್ತು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>				:ದರು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<f%>				:ದಳು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>				:ದವು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>			:ದು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mfn%>			:ದಿವೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mfn%>			:ದಿದ್ದು 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>				:ದಿದ್ದಾನೆ	# ;

%<v%>%<inf%>%<apt%>%<pres%>					:ಯುವ 	# ;!ಬರೆ
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯ loo ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತವೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>				:ಯುತ್ತಾನೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿವೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಿತು 	# ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತದೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿದ್ದ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿದ್ದರು	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>				:ಯುವರು	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿದೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿತ್ತು # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯುತ್ತಾರೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>%<emph%>		:ಯುತ್ತಲೇ 	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯುತ್ತಿರುವ 	# ;

%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಲಾಗುತ್ತದೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯಲಾಗುತ್ತಿತ್ತು	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯಲಾಗುವ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>				:ಯಲಾಯಿತು 	# ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಲ್ಪಡುವ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಲಾಗಿದೆ 	# ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಲಾದ	# ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>				:ಯಾಗುವ 	# ;!ಯುವುದು
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>				:ಯುವುದು 	# ;
%<v%>%<pp%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>				:ಯಲಿದ್ದ 	# ;!ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುವ
%<v%>%<inf%>%<neg%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>		:ಯಲಾಗದು # ;

%<v%>%<inf%>								:ಯ bahudu ;
%<v%>%<inf%>								:ಯ beku ;

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>			:ante  ;

%<v%>%<ger%>%<nom%>		:ಯುವುದು # ;
%<v%>%<ger%>%<nom%>		:ಯುವುದ untu  ;
%<v%>%<ger%>%<loc%>		:ಯುವಲ್ಲಿ # ;

%<v%>%<refl%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>		:ದು kondu ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>		:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುವ # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>	:ದುಕೊಂಡು # ;!ದುಕೊಂಡು different?
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>	:ದುಕೊಂಡು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>		:ದುಕೊಂಡ # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>		:ದುಕೊಂಡರು # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>		:ದುಕೊಂಡಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>		:ದುಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;!ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುವ
%<v%>%<refl%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>		:ದುಕೊಳ್ಳುವ # ;!ಸಿಕೊಂಡು
%<v%>%<refl%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>		:ಸಿಕೊಂಡು # ;!

%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>				:ಯ beku  ;!ಕರೆಯಲ್ಪಡುತ್ತದೆ
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>				:ಯಲ್ ಪಡು__vaux  ;!ಕರೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>				:ದವರ aagi__com ;
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>				:ಯಲೋಸುಗವ oo__inc_clit ;

%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸಿ kondu ;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸಿದರು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸಿದ್ದರು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸಿದ್ದಾರೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸ loo ;
%<v%>%<cause%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>	:ಸುವ # ;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಿದ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಿ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಲಾಗುತ್ತದೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಿತು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತದೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಿದ್ದ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಲಾಯಿತು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಿದ್ದರು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಿ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಾರೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಲಾದ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಿರುವ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುವುದು #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಿದೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸಿದ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತವೆ #;
%<v%>%<cause%>:ಸುತ್ತಿದ್ದಾರೆ #;


%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>			:ದು kondu	 ;


LEXICON aaga
%+ಆಗ%<adv%>:ಾಗ # ;


!LEXICON 				ಗುರುತಿಸು__v
!%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲ್ಪಡುವ # ;!ಪಡುವ?
!%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ುವ # ;!Present-future adjectival participle
!%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲು # ;
!%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಿ # ;
!%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲಾಗಿದೆ # ;
!%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಬಹುದು # ;



LEXICON __emph
%+ಯೇ%<emph%>:ಯೇ #;


LEXICON 				aagi__com
:ವ 	aagi__vaux ;	
:ಯ 	aagi__vaux ;	
:ರ 	aagi__vaux ;	
:ನ 	aagi__vaux ;	
: 	aagi__vaux ;	

LEXICON 	 			aagi__vaux				!aagi 
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sp%>:ಾಗಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<opt%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾದುದಾಗಿರಲಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾದುದ r__inda ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<opt%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗಿರಲಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<opt%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗಲಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>:ಾಗಲಿರುವ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ಾಗಿದ್ದರು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ಾಗಿದ್ದು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ಾದವು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಗಲೀ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿದೆ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿರ beku ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗುವ varege__postpos ;!
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿ __emph ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಗ loo ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಗ bahudu ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಗುವ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಾಗು ante ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಗಿವೆ # ;!
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಗುವುದ illa  ;!ger?
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಾಗುತ್ತವೆ # ;

!1
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಯಿತು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾದೀತು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾದ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾದುದು # ;
!%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>			:ಾಗಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗುದು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗುದಿ ide__vaux ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾದದ್ದು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾದ್ದ r__inda  ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<nt%>%<neg%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗದೆ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿದೆ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಗಿರಲಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿತ್ತು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>				:ಾದಳು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%> 				:ಾದರು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗ illa  ;

!2
!%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿತ್ತು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<cni%>		:ಾದರೂ # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>				:ಾದರು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿರುವುದು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿ ide__vaux ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<nt%>%<sg%>				:ಾಗಿರುತ್ತದೆ # ;

%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<vpt%>%<neg%>:ಾಗದ # ;


LEXICON 				aadharu__vaux
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<hon%>:ರಾದರು # ;
%+ಆಗಿ%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ರಾದರು # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ನಿರತರ:ನಿರತರ 								aagi__com;!
ಆರಂಭ:ಆರಂಭ  								aagi__com;
ಪ್ರಾರಂಭ:ಪ್ರಾರಂಭ 							aagi__com;
ಸ್ಥಾಪಿತ:ಸ್ಥಾಪಿತ  							aagi__com;!repeat
ಕಡಿಮೆ:ಕಡಿಮೆ 								aagi__com;
